Illinois, session 104th, HB263.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Stalking No Contact Order Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (740 ILCS 21/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Stalking No Contact Order Act.9(Source: P.A. 96-246, eff. 1-1-10.)